Utah statutes.
41-6a-526.   Drinking alcoholic beverage and open containers in motor
vehicle prohibited -- Definitions -- Exceptions.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Alcoholic beverage" has the same meaning as defined in Section
32A-1-105.
(b)  "Chartered bus" has the same meaning as defined in Section 32A-1-105.
(c)  "Limousine" has the same meaning as defined in Section 32A-1-105.
(d) (i)  "Passenger compartment" means the area of the vehicle normally
occupied by the operator and passengers.
(ii)  "Passenger compartment" includes areas accessible to the operator and
passengers while traveling, including a utility or glove compartment.
(iii)  "Passenger compartment" does not include a separate front or rear trunk
compartment or other area of the vehicle not accessible to the operator or
passengers while inside the vehicle.
(2)  A person may not drink any alcoholic beverage while operating a motor
vehicle or while a passenger in a motor vehicle, whether the vehicle is
moving, stopped, or parked on any highway.
(3)  A person may not keep, carry, possess, transport, or allow another to
keep, carry, possess, or transport in the passenger compartment of a motor
vehicle, when the vehicle is on any highway, any container which contains any
alcoholic beverage if the container has been opened, its seal broken, or the
contents of the container partially consumed.
(4)  Subsections (2) and (3) do not apply to a passenger:
(a)  in the living quarters of a motor home or camper;
(b)  who has carried an alcoholic beverage onto a limousine or chartered bus
that is in compliance with Subsections 32A-12-213(3)(b) and (c); or
(c)  in a motorboat or on the waters of this state as these terms are defined
in Section 73-18-2.
(5)  Subsection (3) does not apply to passengers traveling in any licensed
taxicab or bus.
